Washington statutes.
RCW 11.97.020

Trust term interpretation and property disposition—Rules of construction.

The rules of construction that apply in this state to the interpretation of a will and disposition of property by will also apply as appropriate to the interpretation of the terms of a trust and the disposition of the trust property.

[ 2011 c 327 s 13.]

NOTES:

Application—Effective date—2011 c 327: See notes following RCW 11.103.020.